Mississippi, session 2026, SB2282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-39-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-53.  When used in this chapter, these words and phrases shall be defined as follows: (a)  "Abandoned" means to forsake entirely, to neglect or refuse to provide or perform legal obligations for the care and support of an animal or to refuse to pay for treatment or other services without an assertion of good cause. (b)  "Accredited college of veterinary medicine" means any veterinary college, school or division of a university or college that offers the degree of doctor of veterinary medicine or its equivalent and that is accredited by the Council on Education of the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA). (c)  "Accredited program in veterinary technology/technician" means any postsecondary educational program that is accredited by the Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and Activities of the AVMA. (d)  "Animal" means any animal other than a human. (e)  "Board" means the Board of Veterinary Medicine. (f)  "Client" means the patient's owner, owner's agent or other person responsible for the patient. (g)  "Complementary, alternative and integrative therapies" means a heterogeneous group of preventive, diagnostic, and therapeutic philosophies and practices, which at the time they are performed may differ from current scientific knowledge, or whose theoretical basis and techniques may diverge from veterinary medicine routinely taught in accredited veterinary medical colleges, or both.  These therapies include, but are not limited to, veterinary acupuncture, acutherapy and acupressure; veterinary homeopathy; veterinary manual or manipulative therapy (therapies based on techniques practiced in osteopathy, chiropractic medicine or physical medicine and therapy); veterinary nutraceutical therapy; and veterinary phytotherapy. (h)  "Consultation" means when a licensed veterinarian receives advice in person, telephonically, electronically or by any other method of communication, from a veterinarian licensed in this or any other state or other person whose expertise, in the opinion of the licensed veterinarian, would benefit a patient. (i)  "Certified veterinary technician" means a veterinary technician certified by the board. (j)  "Direct supervision" means a licensed veterinarian is readily available on the premises where the patient is being treated. (k)  "Educational equivalence" means the holder has demonstrated knowledge and skill equivalent to that possessed by a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine. (l)  "Extralabel use" means actual use or intended use of a drug in an animal in a manner that is not in accordance with the approved labeling.  This includes, but is not limited to, use in species not listed in the labeling, use for indications (disease or other conditions) not listed in the labeling, use at dosage levels, frequencies, or routes of administration other than those stated in the labeling, and deviation from the labeled withdrawal time based on these different uses. (m)  "Impaired veterinarian" means a veterinarian who is unable to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written determination from a competent authority or written consent based on clinical evidence, including deterioration of mental capacity, loss of motor skills, or abuse of drugs or alcohol of sufficient degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent patient care. (n)  "Indirect supervision" means a veterinarian has given either written or oral instructions for treatment of the patient and is readily available by telephone or other form of communication. (o)  "Informed consent" means the veterinarian has informed the client, in a manner that would be understood by a reasonable person, of the diagnostic and treatment options, risk assessment and prognosis and has provided the client with an estimate of the charges for veterinary services to be rendered and the client has consented to the recommended treatment. (p)  "Licensed veterinarian" means a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state. (q)  "Patient" means an animal that is examined or treated by a veterinarian. (r)  "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership (general, limited or limited liability), association, joint venture, cooperative, corporation, limited liability company or any other group or combination acting in concert and whether or not acting as a principal, partner, member, trustee, fiduciary, receiver or as any other kind of legal or personal representative or as the successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant, employee, director, officer or any other representative of such person. (s)  "Practice of veterinary medicine" means: (i)  To diagnose, treat, correct, change, alleviate or prevent animal disease, illness, pain, deformity, defect, injury or other physical, dental or mental conditions by any method or mode, including: 1.  The prescribing, dispensing, administering or applying of any drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, anesthetic or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or medical or surgical technique; or 2.  The using of complementary, alternative and integrative therapies; or 3.  The rendering of advice or recommendation by any means including telephonic and other electronic communications with regard to any of the above. (ii)  To represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability and willingness to do an act described in this paragraph. (iii)  To use any title, words, abbreviation or letters in a manner or under circumstances that induce the belief that the person using them is qualified to do any act described in this paragraph. (t)  "Practice of veterinary technology" means to perform patient care or other services that require a technical understanding of veterinary medicine on the basis of written or oral instruction of a veterinarian, excluding diagnosing, prognosing, performing surgery or prescribing drugs, medicine or appliances. (u)  "Veterinarian" means a person who * * * has received a professional veterinary medical degree from a college of veterinary medicine. falls within one (1) of the following categories: (i)  1.  Is a graduate of an accredited college or a school of veterinary medicine accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association Council on Education or possesses an ECFVG or PAVE certificate or substantial equivalent; and 2.  Has passed a board approved examination; provided, however, that the board may provide by rule or regulation for a waiver of any part of such examination for veterinarians who are licensed as such by another state and who are in good standing therein; or (ii)  1.  Is a graduate of a foreign college or school of veterinary medicine; and 2.  Has completed a residency program or similar training duration program of two (2) or more years and has received board certification from a veterinary medical specialty organization recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association, the American Board of Veterinary Specialties or other American Veterinary Medical Association board approved organization; provided, however, that such application upon licensure shall only be authorized to practice veterinary medicine in the area of his or her certified veterinary medical specialty; and provided, further, that any other practice of veterinary medicine shall be deemed a violation of Sections 73-39-67 and 73-39-91. (v)  "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means that all of the following are required: (i)  The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making clinical judgments regarding the health of the animal and the need for medical treatment, and the client has agreed to follow the veterinarian's instructions. (ii)  The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal because the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal either by virtue of an examination of the animal or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal is kept. (w)  "Veterinary medicine" means all branches and specialties included within the practice of veterinary medicine. (x)  "Veterinary premises" means any premises or facility where the practice of veterinary medicine occurs, including, but not limited to, a mobile clinic, outpatient clinic, satellite clinic or veterinary hospital or clinic, but shall not include the premises of a veterinary client, research facility, a federal military base or an accredited college of veterinary medicine. (y)  "Veterinary prescription drug" means a drug that may not be dispensed without the prescription of a veterinarian and that bears the label statement:  "CAUTION:  Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian." (z)  "Veterinary technician" means a person certified by the board as a veterinary technician. (aa)  "Veterinary technologist" means a graduate of a four-year accredited program in veterinary technology. SECTION 2.  Section 73-39-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-59.  (1)  No person may practice veterinary medicine in the state who is not a licensed veterinarian * * * or, the holder of a valid temporary permit issued by the board, is considered a veterinarian as defined in Section 73-39-53(u)(ii) or unless otherwise exempt under this chapter. (2)  No person may practice veterinary medicine in the state except within the context of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship. (3)  A veterinarian-client-patient relationship cannot be established solely by telephonic or other electronic means. SECTION 3.  Section 73-39-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-61.  This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit: (a)  Any employee of the federal, state or local government performing his or her official duties. (b)  Any student in an accredited college of veterinary medicine or an accredited program in veterinary technology performing duties or actions assigned by instructors or working under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian. (c)  Any person advising or performing acts that the board has designated by rule as accepted livestock management practices. (d)  Any person providing consultation to a licensed veterinarian in this state on the care and management of a patient. (e)  Any member in good standing of another licensed or regulated profession within any state, or any member of an organization or group approved by the board, providing assistance requested by a veterinarian licensed in the state, acting with informed consent from the client, and acting under the direct or indirect supervision and control of the licensed veterinarian.  Providing assistance involves hands-on active participation in the treatment and care of the patient.  The licensed veterinarian shall maintain responsibility for the veterinarian-client-patient relationship. (f)  Any veterinarian employed by an accredited college of veterinary medicine providing assistance requested by a veterinarian licensed in the state, acting with informed consent from the client, and acting under the direct or indirect supervision and control of the licensed veterinarian. Providing assistance involves hands-on active participation in the treatment and care of the patient.  The licensed veterinarian shall maintain responsibility for the veterinarian-client-patient relationship. (g)  Any pharmacist, merchant or manufacturer selling at his or her regular place of business medicines, feed, appliances or other products used in the prevention or treatment of animal diseases as permitted by law. (h)  Any person lawfully engaged in horseshoeing. (i)  Any person rendering advice without expectation of compensation. (j)  Any owner of an animal and any of the owner's regular employees caring for and treating the animal belonging to such owner, except when the ownership of the animal was transferred for purposes of circumventing this chapter.  A veterinarian-client-patient relationship must exist when prescription drugs or nonprescription drugs intended for extralabel use are administered, dispensed or prescribed. (k)  Any instructor at an accredited college of veterinary medicine or accredited program in veterinary technology performing his or her regular functions or any person lecturing or giving instructions or demonstrations at an accredited college of veterinary medicine, accredited program in veterinary technology or in a veterinary or veterinary technology continuing education course or seminar. (l)  Any person selling or applying pesticides, insecticides or herbicides as permitted by law. (m)  Any person engaging in bona fide scientific research that reasonably requires experimentation involving animals. (n)  Any certified veterinary technician or other employee of a licensed veterinarian performing duties other than diagnosis, prognosis, prescription or surgery under the direction and supervision of the veterinarian who shall be responsible for the performance of the employee. (o)  Any graduate of a nonaccredited college of veterinary medicine who is in the process of obtaining educational equivalence and is performing duties or actions assigned by instructors in an accredited college of veterinary medicine. (p)  Any person who, without expectation of compensation, provides emergency veterinary care in an emergency or disaster situation. (q)  Any animal shelter employee acting under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian or authorized by the board to perform euthanasia in the course and scope of employment. (r)  Any wildlife rehabilitator that is licensed by a federal or state agency performing duties in accordance with its licensure authority. (s)  Any person considered a veterinarian permitted to practice veterinary medicine in the area of his or her certified veterinary medical specialty as outlined in Section 73-39-53(u)(ii). (t)  Any person licensed pursuant to Section 73-39-53(u)(ii) from lecturing or giving instructions or demonstrations in an area within his or her certified veterinary medical specialty at an accredited college or school of veterinary medicine or school of veterinary technology and in connection with a continuing education course or seminar. SECTION 4.  Section 73-39-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-67.  (1) To obtain a license to practice veterinary medicine, a person shall file a written application and application fee with the board.  The application shall show that the applicant: (a)  Is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine; (b)  Is a graduate of a foreign college or school of veterinary medicine and has completed a residency program or similar training duration program of two (2) or more years and is recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association, the American Board of Veterinary Specialties or other American Veterinary Medical Association board approved organization; provided, however, that such application upon licensure shall only be authorized to practice veterinary medicine in the area of his or her certified veterinary medical specialty; and provided, further, that any other practice of veterinary medicine shall be deemed a violation of Sections 73-39-67 and 73-39-91; or (c)  Has the educational equivalence as set by the board. The application shall also show that the applicant is a person of good moral character and any other information and proof as the board may require. (2)  If the board determines that the applicant possesses the proper qualifications, it shall admit the applicant to the next examination, or if the applicant is eligible for license by endorsement, the board may grant him or her a license.  If an applicant is found not qualified to take the examination or for a license by endorsement, the board shall notify the applicant in writing within thirty (30) days of its finding and the grounds for its findings.  An applicant found unqualified may request a hearing before the board. (3)  The board may grant a temporary license to an applicant to practice veterinary medicine until the scheduled state board examination, if the applicant pays the application fee, provides sufficient evidence that he or she meets the qualifications for licensure, and provides evidence that he or she resides in the State of Mississippi.  The board may grant a second temporary permit, but the board may not grant more than two (2) temporary permits to any one (1) person. (4)  A person licensed by the board shall display the license in the facility in which the licensee practices. SECTION 5.  Section 73-39-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-71.  (1)  The board may issue a license by endorsement to an applicant who furnishes satisfactory proof that he or she: (a)  Is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine; (b)  Is a graduate of a foreign college or school of veterinary medicine and has completed a residency program or similar training duration program of two (2) or more years and is recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association, the American Board of Veterinary Specialties or other American Veterinary Medical Association board approved organization; provided, however, that such application upon licensure shall only be authorized to practice veterinary medicine in the area of his or her certified veterinary medical specialty; and provided, further, that any other practice of veterinary medicine shall be deemed a violation of Sections 73-39-67 and 73-39-91; or (c)  Has the educational equivalence as set by the board. The applicant must also show that he or she is a person of good moral character and is licensed to practice veterinary medicine in at least one (1) state, territory or district of the United States and has practiced veterinary medicine in one or more of those states without disciplinary action by any state or federal agency for at least the three (3) years immediately before filing the application. (2)  The board may examine any person qualifying for licensing under this section. (3)  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.